da: Baby og småbørn > Babytransport: Baby og småbørn – bilsæder; Babybæreseler; Babyklapvogn
es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Transporte de bebés: Sillas de coche; Mochilas portabebés; Cochecitos de bebé
ja: ベビー用品 > ベビー用外出用品: チャイルドシート; 抱っこひも; ベビーカー
nb: Baby og barn > Babytransport: Bilstoler for baby og barn; Bæreseler og bæresjal; Babyvogner
en: Baby & Toddler > Baby Transport: Baby & Toddler Car Seats; Baby Carriers; Baby Strollers
nl: Baby en peuter > Baby's vervoeren: Autozitjes voor baby's en peuters; Draagdoeken en -zakken voor baby's; Wandelwagens
cs: Děti a kojenci > Přeprava dětí: Dětské a kojenecké autosedačky; Vaky na děti; Dětské kočárky
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Transport niemowląt: Foteliki samochodowe dla dzieci i niemowląt; Nosidełka dla niemowląt; Wózki dla niemowląt
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Бебешки транспорт: Столчета за кола за бебета и малки деца; Бебеносещи средства; Бебешки колички
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Transportul bebelușilor: Scaune auto pentru bebeluși/copii mici; Articole pentru transportul copiilor; Cărucioare pentru copii
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Transporte do bebé: Cadeirinhas automóveis para bebé e criança; Transportadoras de bebé; Carrinhos de passeio para bebé
sv: Baby och småbarn > Barntransport: Bilbarnstolar; Bärselar; Barnvagnar
ru: Товары для детей > Прогулки и путешествия с детьми: Автокресла; Слинги и детские переноски; Детские коляски
pt-BR: Infantil > Transporte de bebês: Cadeiras de bebê para automóvel; Cangurus; Carrinhos de bebê
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Babytransport: Baby- & Kleinkindautositze; Babyträger; Kinderwagen
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Kūdikių transportas: Automobilinės kėdutės kūdikiams ir mažiems vaikams; Kūdikių nešynės; Kūdikių vežimėliai
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 嬰兒外出用品: 嬰幼兒汽車安全座椅; 嬰兒背巾; 嬰兒推車
sk-SK: Bábätká > Preprava detí: Dojčenské autosedačky; Detské nosiče; Detské kočíky
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Prijevoz za bebe: Autosjedalice za bebe i malu djecu; Nosiljke za bebe; Dječja kolica
ko: 영유아 > 영유아용 캐리어: 영유아 카시트; 아기띠; 유모차
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Vauvan kuljetus: Vauvan ja leikki-ikäisen autonistuimet; Vauvan kantoreput; Lastenvaunut
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Prevoz otrok: Avtosedeži za dojenčke in malčke; Otroške nosilke; Otroški vozički
it: Bebè e bimbi > Trasporto bebè: Seggiolini per auto; Marsupi portabebè; Passeggini
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Bebek Taşıma Ürünleri: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Oto Koltukları; Kangurular; Bebek Arabaları
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Transport de bébés: Sièges auto pour bébés et enfants; Porte-bébés; Poussettes pour bébés
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > Xe đẩy cho trẻ em: Ghế ngồi ô tô cho trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ nhỏ; Địu em bé; Xe đẩy cho bé
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Babaszállítás: Baba- és csecsemő autósülések; Babahordozó; Babakocsik
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > การเคลื่อนย้ายเด็กทารก: ที่นั่งในรถสำหรับทารกและเด็กเล็ก; ที่เคลื่อนย้ายทารก; รถเข็นเด็ก
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Μεταφορά βρέφους: Βρεφικά & παιδικά καθίσματα αυτοκινήτου; Μάρσιποι μεταφοράς μωρού; Βρεφικά καρότσια
zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 婴儿出行用品: 婴幼儿汽车座椅; 婴儿背带; 婴儿手推车